Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 6 Disposal of Solid Wastes and Other Refuse
8-6-615. Distribution of funds to regional solid waste management districts — Reporting requirements.

Funds collected under this subchapter and deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the Solid Waste Management and Recycling Fund, less up to twenty percent (20%) for administrative support for the Division of Environmental Quality, shall be allocated annually to each of the approved regional solid waste management districts utilizing a combination of the two (2) methods stated in subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

Fifty percent (50%) of the funds shall be determined using the method provided in subsection (b) of this section, and fifty percent (50%) shall be determined using the method provided in subsection (c) of this section.

The total figures obtained from each method shall be combined to arrive at each regional solid waste management district's fund distribution.

The division shall determine the amount of funds within each planning and development district organized under § 14-166-201 et seq., and recognized by the Governor, based on the same distribution as general revenue support is distributed to the planning and development districts in the current fiscal year.

The division shall adjust the distribution described in subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section within the planning and development districts to coincide with the boundaries of the regional solid waste management districts by determining each county's share of the funds available within each planning and development district.

Each county's share shall be based on the proportion that each county's population bears to the total population in the planning and development district to which the county is assigned, multiplied by the amount of funds determined to be available within the planning and development district.

The county's proportional share as determined under this subdivision (b)(1) shall be added to all other counties' shares within the same regional solid waste management district.

The formula to be used under this subsection is as follows:

Divide fifty percent (50%) of the total remaining funds equally by the eight (8) regional planning and development districts;

Multiply the quotient obtained under subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section by the most recent federal decennial census population of each county; and

Divide the product obtained under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section by the planning and development district population in which the county is located to determine the portion per county.

Individual county portions are grouped and totaled by each new regional solid waste management district to determine each regional solid waste management district's allocation.

The remaining fifty percent (50%) of the funds shall be based on the ratio of the district's 2010 or current decennial census population divided by the most recent federal decennial census state population.

The formula to be used under this subsection is as follows:

Divide each solid waste management district's total population by the state's most recent federal decennial census population; and

Multiply the quotient obtained under subdivision (c)(2)(A) of this section by the total remaining funds to determine each regional solid waste management district's allocation.

For each fiscal year, each regional solid waste management board that receives funds under this section shall provide a report by November 1 to the division that explains how the board spent the funding received under this section in the previous fiscal year.

The report under this subsection shall include the following information concerning the amount of expenditures in the previous fiscal year from the funds received under this section for:

Equipment and material purchases; and

Operation costs.

The report shall be in a spreadsheet form as prescribed by the division.

The Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission may promulgate rules necessary for funding and program reporting, accountability, and oversight under this subsection.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1333, § 5; 2017, No. 624, §§ 4, 5; 2019, No. 315, § 547; 2019, No. 693, § 15; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2637-2640.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 624, § 9, provided: “Distribution of funds from landfill disposal fees.

“(a)(1)

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall determine the total moneys available on the day before the effective date of this act [August 1, 2017] at 11:59 p.m. that were collected under § 8-6-612 [repealed] for computer and electronic equipment recycling programs.

“(2)

The moneys available under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be used to fund computer and electronic equipment recycling programs under Arkansas Code § 8-6-613(c) until all moneys are distributed as provided under this subsection.

“(3)(A)

The use of any interest earnings or investment earnings on the moneys available under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall not be restricted to computer and electronic equipment recycling programs after the effective date of this act [August 1, 2017].

“(B)

The interest earnings and investment earnings on the moneys available under this subsection shall be used as provided under § 8-6-605.

“(4)(A)

For each fiscal year, two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) of the moneys available under subdivision (a)(1) of this section shall be added to the distribution of funding to regional solid waste management districts under Arkansas Code § 8-6-615.

“(B)

When the balance of the moneys allocated under subdivision (a)(1) of this section is less than two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) for a fiscal year, all of the available moneys remaining in the fund shall be the last moneys used to supplement the distribution to the regional solid waste management districts under § 8-6-615 for that fiscal year.

“(5)

For each fiscal year, the Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality shall determine the amount of the moneys allocated under subdivision (a)(4) of this section that are included in each regional solid waste management district's fund distribution under § 8-6-615 and provide that information to the regional solid waste management districts.

“(6)(A)

Except as otherwise provided under subdivision (a)(6)(B) of this section, each regional solid waste management district shall use the moneys received under subdivision (a)(5) of this section for computer and electronic equipment recycling programs.

“(B)

Moneys received under this section by a regional solid waste management district but not needed for computer and electronic equipment recycling may be used for another recycling project operated by the regional solid waste management district only if the regional solid waste management board that governs a regional solid waste management district certifies that the funds are not needed for the approved computer and electronic equipment recycling program.

“(b)

This section expires after the final distribution of the moneys allocated under subdivision (a)(4)(B) of this section to the regional solid waste management districts.”

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “this subchapter” for “§ 8-6-607” in (a)(1)(A); and added (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d)(4).

The 2019 amendment by No. 693 substituted “For each fiscal year” for “After August 1, 2017, and for each subsequent fiscal year” in (d)(1).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section.

8-6-616. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning distribution of funds to regional solid waste management districts for computer and electronic equipment recycling programs, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 624, § 6. The section was derived from Acts 2015, No. 1176, § 2.

Subchapter 7
— Regional Solid Waste Management Districts and Boards

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 870, § 15, provided: “The provisions of this act shall be in addition and supplemental to all other laws of Arkansas now in effect pertaining to solid waste and solid waste management and regulation, and shall repeal only such laws or parts of laws as may be specifically in conflict with this act.”

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 5, provided: “Any solid waste management system operating under the authority of § 14-233-101 et seq. with five (5) or more counties currently being served by these authorities upon the passage of this act shall, upon notification to the regional board and the Commission, shall be designated a regional solid waste management district. The governing body of the district shall be as determined by the authority by resolution.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 870 and Acts 1991, No. 319 were held to be unconstitutional as applied to solid wastes originating outside the State of Arkansas in Southeast Ark. Landfill, Inc. v. Arkansas Dep't of Pollution Control and Ecology, 981 F.2d 372 (8th Cir. 1992).

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 1, provided: “The Arkansas General Assembly makes the following findings:

“(1)

The present landfill capacity in the State of Arkansas is inadequate and is at or near the critical point;

“(2)

As of July 30, 1990, the capacity in Arkansas was about 4.3 years of landfill life for 63 municipal solid waste landfills;

“(3)

Adequate solid waste management planning is not possible at the present time because of the lack of accurate statistics on industrial landfill capacity and use; and

“(4)

The state has taken important steps to encourage recycling but a much greater effort is necessary to assist in addressing out solid waste management needs.”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1989, No. 870, § 16: Mar. 22, 1989. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Seventh General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current system regulating solid waste in Arkansas does not foster long-range planning or efficient allocation of the State's solid waste resources; that some areas are facing serious shortages of capacity to the point of crisis and other areas have excess capacity to the point it wastes resources; and therefore to conserve precious financial resources and to avoid unnecessary land and water pollution, a system of regional solid waste planning should be implemented. Therefore, in order to address this serious environmental problem, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 9, § 5: Jan. 31, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “The present moratorium on out-of-state solid waste being received into landfills of this state expires January 31, 1991; this act extends that moratorium until March 2, 1991; that unless this act goes into effect immediately the existing law will expire and this law will not go into effect until after March 2, 1991. Therefore an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 9: Mar. 26, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that some areas of the state are facing critical shortages of solid waste disposal capacity due to the difficulties in sitting landfill facilities and the difficulties of financing public waste recovery and disposal facilities at the local level. It is found that regional solid waste authorities are needed to expedite the financing, sitting, and operation of new waste management facilities in order that the health and welfare of the citizens of Arkansas be insured and that the state's environment be protected. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 619, § 8: Mar. 22, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Ninth General Assembly that expediting the transfer of solid waste between solid waste management districts will significantly benefit the districts, the citizens of Arkansas, and the environment; and this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety; therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 341, § 5: Mar. 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the law concerning the transfer and receipt of solid waste in the State of Arkansas is inadequate. This bill will expand the ability of Regional Solid Waste Management Districts to seek the effective disposal of solid waste. Providing these agreements will enhance districts' ability to manage solid waste in a more cost-effective manner. Immediate action on this bill is necessary to provide uninterrupted solid waste disposal services throughout the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 631, § 5: Mar. 16, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the proper siting of transfer stations is essential to achieve the goals of efficient, effective, and environmentally sound regional solid waste management and planning. It is found that the regional solid waste management districts and boards must have the authority to evaluate, manage and coordinate the siting, location, and operation of transfer stations in order that the health and welfare of the citizens of Arkansas be ensured and the state's environment be protected. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2011, No. 209, § 3: Mar. 8, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that unintended consequences of court action regarding the wording of Arkansas Code § 8-6-714, have been curtailed or discontinued a main source of funding for many of the programs of the solid waste management districts; that reinstatement of these funding sources and the immediate collection of these fees will put the Solid Waste Management District’s budgets back on track; and that this act is immediately necessary because no other funding source in state government currently exists to continue these programs of the Solid Waste Management Districts to provide services necessary to the health and welfare of Arkansas citizens and to safeguard the state’s fragile ecological health and well being. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

8-6-701. Purpose — Legislative findings — Construction.

The purpose of this subchapter is to protect the public health and the state's environmental quality by establishing regional solid waste management and planning. The current system, relying upon solid waste management by individual counties and municipalities, has fostered present conditions in which certain areas of the state are facing capacity shortages of crisis proportions, while others experience a surfeit of capacity with individual disposal facilities which cannot muster the resources for environmentally responsible operators. Given these disparate environmental and economic concerns, the General Assembly concludes that regional solid waste management and planning, under the oversight of the Division of Environmental Quality and the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission, is essential to address the imminent and future needs of the state. The terms and obligations of this subchapter shall be liberally construed so as to achieve remedial intent.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 870, § 1; 1991, No. 752, § 2; 1999, No. 1164, § 70; 2019, No. 910, § 2641.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality”.

8-6-702. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Board” or “regional board” means a regional solid waste management board established pursuant to this subchapter;

“Commission” means the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Disposal site” means any place at which solid waste is dumped, accepted, or disposed of for final disposition by landfilling, incinerating, composting, or any other method;

“District” means a regional solid waste management district;

“Interested party” means the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality or his or her designee, the board, the person making application to the board, or any person submitting written comments on an application within the public comment period;

“Landfill” means a permitted landfill under the Arkansas Solid Waste Management Act, § 8-6-201 et seq.;

“Materials in the recycling process” means ferrous and nonferrous metals diverted or removed from the solid waste stream so that they may be reused, as long as such materials are processed or handled using reasonably available processing equipment and control technology as determined by the director, taking cost into account, and a substantial amount of the materials are consistently utilized to manufacture a product which otherwise would have been produced using virgin material;

“Recyclable materials” or “recyclables” means those materials from the solid waste stream that can be recovered for reuse in present or reprocessed form;

“Recyclable materials collection center” or “collection center” means a facility which receives or stores recyclable materials prior to timely transportation to material recovery facilities, markets for recycling, or disposal;

“Recycling” means the systematic collection, sorting, decontaminating, and returning of waste materials to commerce as commodities for use or exchange;

“Solid waste” means all putrescible and nonputrescible wastes in solid, semisolid, or liquid form, including, but not limited to, yard or food waste, waste glass, waste metals, waste plastics, wastepaper, waste paperboard, and all other solid and semisolid wastes resulting from industrial, commercial, agricultural, community, and residential activities, but does not include materials in the recycling process as defined in this section;

“Solid waste management system” means the same as provided in § 8-6-203;

“Source separation” means the act or process of removing a particular type of recyclable material from the solid waste stream at the point of generation or at a point under control of the generator for the purpose of collection and recycling; and

“Yard waste” means grass clippings, leaves, and shrubbery trimmings.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 870, § 2; 1991, No. 752, § 2; 1993, No. 479, § 1; 1999, No. 1164, § 71; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2642, 2643.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment repealed (3) and (4); and substituted “Director of the Division of Environmental Quality” for “director” in (9).

8-6-703. Creation of districts and boards — Members of boards.

The eight (8) regional solid waste planning districts created by Acts 1989, No. 870, and each solid waste service area created pursuant to Acts 1989, No. 870, are renamed regional solid waste management districts.

Each regional solid waste management district shall be governed by a regional solid waste management board.

The boundaries of a regional solid waste management district may be modified and new regional solid waste management districts may be created pursuant to § 8-6-707.

Each board shall be composed of representatives of:

The counties within the regional solid waste management district;

All cities of the first class within the regional solid waste management district;

All cities with a population over two thousand (2,000) according to the most recent federal decennial census within the regional solid waste management district;

The largest city of each county within the regional solid waste management district; and

Any city that holds a position on any board on or after January 1, 2010, within the regional solid waste management district.

The county judge of each county within the regional solid waste management district and the mayor of each city entitled to a representative in the regional solid waste management district shall serve on the board, unless the county judge or mayor elects instead to appoint a member as follows:

The county judge, with confirmation by the quorum court of each county within the regional solid waste management district, shall appoint one (1) member to the board; and

The mayor, with confirmation by the governing body of each city entitled to a representative in the regional solid waste management district, shall appoint one (1) member.

Each board shall have a minimum of five (5) members.

If the number of members serving under subsection (b) of this section is less than five (5), additional members necessary to make the total number equal five (5) shall be appointed by mutual agreement of the other board members and shall represent the general public within the regional solid waste management district.

Appointed board members shall serve at the pleasure of the appointing body and a minimum term of one (1) year.

Vacancies shall be filled for any unexpired term of an appointed member in the same manner as provided in subsection (b) of this section and subdivision (c)(2) of this section.

A majority of the membership of the board in person or represented by proxy shall constitute a quorum.

A majority vote of those members present shall be required for any action of the board.

Each board shall annually select a chair.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 870, § 3; 1991, No. 752, §§ 2, 3; 2003, No. 215, § 1; 2011, No. 884, § 1; 2013, No. 316, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1989, No. 750, § 3, provided, in part: “There are hereby created eight (8) Regional Solid Waste Planning Districts and eight (8) Regional Solid Waste Planning Boards whose respective jurisdictions shall correspond to the boundaries of the Planning and Development Districts established pursuant to Arkansas Code § 14-166-202.”

The terms of the general public members of each regional solid waste management board are arranged so that one (1) term expires every year.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 2, provided in part, that the initial appointed members of the board would draw lots to determine terms of appointment so that, as nearly as possible, the terms of an equal number of members will expire each year.

Acts 1991, No. 752, § 3 provided, in part:

“(a)

A county shall not be included in the boundaries of more than one (1) regional solid waste management district formed from a regional solid waste planning district created pursuant to this act.

“(b)

The members of regional solid waste planning boards and solid waste service area boards shall serve as board members of their respective regional solid waste management districts until sixty (60) days after the effective date of this act.

“(c)

New members shall be appointed to the regional solid waste management boards pursuant to this act. The terms of the new appointees to the regional solid waste management boards shall begin sixty (60) days after the effective date of this act.

“(d)

The first meeting of the new board members shall be held within ninety (90) days after the effective date of this act. At the initial meeting the members shall draw lots to determine their terms of appointment so that, as nearly as possible, the terms of an equal number of members will expire each year.”

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment inserted (b)(1)(E).

The 2013 amendment inserted “regional solid waste management” preceding “district” throughout the section; and added “within the regional solid waste management district” at the end of (b)(1)(B), (b)(1)(C) and (b)(1)(D).

8-6-704. Boards — Powers and duties. [Effective until May 1, 2020.]

The regional solid waste management boards have the following powers and duties:

To collect data, study, and initially evaluate the solid waste management needs of all localities within their regional solid waste management districts, as provided in § 8-6-716, and to publish their findings as a regional needs assessment;

To evaluate on a continuous basis the solid waste needs of their districts and thereby update the regional needs assessments at least biennially;

To formulate recommendations to all local governments within their districts on solid waste management issues and to formulate plans for providing adequate solid waste management;

To issue or deny certificates of need to any applicant for a solid waste disposal facility permit within their districts with the exception of permits for landfills when a private industry bears the expense of operating and maintaining the landfill solely for the disposal of waste generated by the industry or wastes of a similar kind or character;

To petition the Director of the Division of Environmental Quality to issue, continue in effect, revoke, modify, or deny any permit for any element of a solid waste management system located within a district based on compliance or noncompliance with the solid waste management plan of the district;

To adopt rules under the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq., as are reasonably necessary to assure public notice and participation in any findings or rulings of the regional solid waste management boards and to administer the duties of the regional solid waste management boards;

To establish programs to encourage recycling;

To adopt official seals and alter them at pleasure;

To maintain offices at such places as they may determine;

To sue and be sued in their own names and to plead and be impleaded;

To make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or convenient in the exercise of the powers and functions of a district, including, but not limited to, entering into contracts and agreements with private entities for provision of services;

To carry out all other powers and duties conferred by this subchapter and § 8-6-801 et seq.;

To enter into agreements with another district to allow a district or any person within that district to transfer solid waste into another district.

However, notice of all such authorizations shall be submitted to the Division of Environmental Quality within thirty (30) days and shall be incorporated into the regional needs assessment in its next regular update; and

To authorize a disposal facility within a district to accept the receipt of solid waste from an adjoining district upon request by the generator of that solid waste, provided that the request specifies the disposal facility and the nature and estimated annual volume of solid waste to be received.

However, notice of all such authorizations shall be submitted to the division within thirty (30) days and shall be incorporated into the regional needs assessment in its next regular update.

The regional solid waste management boards may:

Apply for such permits, licenses, certificates, or approvals as may be necessary to construct, maintain, and operate any portion of a solid waste management system and to obtain, hold, and use licenses, permits, certificates, or approvals in the same manner as any other person or operating unit of any other person;

Employ such engineers, architects, attorneys, real estate counselors, appraisers, financial advisors, and other consultants and employees as may be required in the judgment of the district and fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the district therefor;

Purchase all kinds of insurance, including, but not limited to, insurance against tort liability, business interruption, and risks of damage to property; and

Employ an environmental officer who may:

Inspect all landfills;

Inspect other solid waste facilities;

Inspect waste haulers and other vehicles;

Ensure compliance with all district regulations;

Collect evidence of noncompliance and present the evidence to the prosecuting attorney; or

Issue citations for the violation of any district regulation.

If a regional solid waste management board employs an environmental officer under this subsection, then the environmental officer may complete the training course for law enforcement officers at the Arkansas Law Enforcement Training Academy.

After satisfactory completion of the training course, the environmental officer shall be a law enforcement officer.

After satisfactory completion of the training course, the environmental officer may:

Carry firearms;

Execute and serve a warrant or other processes issued under the authority of the district and related to violations of district regulations; and

Make arrests and issue citations for violations of district regulations regarding environmental protection.

The regional solid waste management boards shall adopt and follow county purchasing procedures, as provided in § 14-22-101 et seq., as the approved purchasing procedures for the districts.

Each regional solid waste management board shall procure an annual financial audit of the district. Such audits shall be conducted following each board's fiscal year end. Regional solid waste management funds which are subject to audit in conjunction with a single audit performed consistent with Governmental Auditing and Reporting Standards are not required to have a separate audit.

Each district shall choose and employ accountants in good standing with the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy to conduct these audits in accordance with Governmental Auditing and Reporting Standards issued by the United States Comptroller of the Currency.

The district shall pay for such audits from their administrative moneys.

Each audit report and accompanying comments and recommendations shall be reviewed by the appropriate regional solid waste management board.

Copies of each audit report of a district shall be filed with the division and with Arkansas Legislative Audit. In addition, one (1) copy of the audit report shall be kept for public inspection with the books and records of the district.

Failure to provide a full and complete audit report, as required by this subchapter, shall prohibit future distribution of revenue from funding programs that are administered by the division unless otherwise authorized by the director.

Arkansas Legislative Audit shall annually select on a random basis one-third (1/3) of the total number of districts for a review of selected policies, procedures, and transactions.

The review under subdivision (d)(6)(A) of this section shall include without limitation a determination of compliance with applicable criteria.

A report of the reviews under subdivision (d)(6)(A) of this section shall be compiled and presented to:

The Legislative Joint Auditing Committee; and

The division.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 870, § 4; 1991, No. 752, § 2; 1993, No. 619, § 1; 1995, No. 163, § 1; 1997, No. 398, § 1; 1999, No. 341, § 1; 2005, No. 1289, § 1; 2007, No. 209, §§ 1, 2; 2009, No. 1199, § 8; 2019, No. 643, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2644-2647.

Publisher's Notes.

For text of section effective May 1, 2020, see the following version.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “boards have” for “boards shall have” in (a), deleted “the Arkansas Pollution Control and Ecology Commission or” following “To petition” in (a)(5), substituted “rules under” for “such rules or regulations pursuant to” in (a)(6); and inserted “and follow” in (c).

The 2009 amendment substituted “regional” for “district” in (13)(B) and (14)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 643 added (d)(6).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a)(5) and (a)(13)(B); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(14)(B), (d)(4), and (d)(5).